Louisiana, session 2026, SB335.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 24:31.5 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§31.5. Legislative assistants for members
A.(1) Each member of the legislature may employ one or more legislative
assistants, who shall be employed as unclassified state employees.
(2)(a) The Legislative Budgetary Control Council shall establish and provide
for the implementation of a salary schedule for legislative assistants. The Legislative
Budgetary Control Council may make adjustments to the salary schedule for
legislative assistants as necessary.
(b)(i) The total amount allocated by the Legislative Budgetary Control
Council for legislative assistants of a legislator whose legislative district is
comprised of all or a part of more than four parishes shall include an additional
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-643 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 335
amount per year determined by the Legislative Budgetary Control Council for
each parish in excess of four parishes comprising the legislative district for
additional legislative assistants.
(ii) The additional allocation authorized in Item (i) of Subparagraph (b)
of this Paragraph shall not be considered as an increase in or used to calculate
the base salary of legislative assistants.
(3) Each legislator shall determine the qualification requirements of his
legislative assistant or assistants. However, no person who is a member of the family
of the legislator may serve as his legislative assistant.
(4)(a) Each legislative assistant shall perform such duties as the legislator
may assign and shall be paid a salary fixed by the legislator. The salary for any one
legislative assistant shall not exceed the base salary established by the Legislative
Budgetary Control Council plus the equivalent of one step for each year of his
employment as a legislative assistant.
(b) If a legislator employs more than one legislative assistant, the total salary
for all his legislative assistants shall not exceed the base salary established by the
Legislative Budgetary Control Council plus the equivalent of one step for each year
of employment as a legislative assistant of the legislative assistant receiving the
highest salary, or the equivalent of one step for each year of the employing
legislator's service as a legislator, at the option of the employing legislator. The
additional allocation authorized in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection shall not
increase the base salary of a legislative assistant but used only for additional
legislative assistants. However, no legislative assistant shall be paid a salary that
exceeds the base salary established by the Legislative Budgetary Control Council
plus the equivalent of one step for each year of his employment as a legislative
assistant.
(c) The Legislative Budgetary Control Council shall also provide a detailed
mechanism to factor in other governmental experience into the number of years of
experience of a legislative assistant for determining that legislative assistant's salary.
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-643 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 335
(5) The salary of each legislative assistant shall be paid from the funds of the
respective house, withdrawn from the state treasury and deposited in the manner
provided in R.S. 24:31.1, and shall be paid to each individual legislative assistant
whose employment and salary have been certified by a member to his respective
presiding officer. Payment shall be by check signed by the speaker of the House of
Representatives as to the salary of legislative assistants to House members and by
the president of the Senate as to the salary of legislative assistants to Senate
members. Facsimile signatures may be used.
(6) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit the use of contractual secretarial
services in lieu of one or more legislative assistants who shall be paid in accordance
with the salary schedule established by the Legislative Budgetary Control Council.
B. Each legislator who employs one or more legislative assistants as provided
in this Section shall notify the presiding officer of his house in writing as to the name
of each such legislative assistant and the salary to be paid. Any change of person or
salary shall be reported to the presiding officer of his house within ten days after
such change. The respective presiding officer shall hold such reports during the term
of office of the legislator involved.
C.(1)(a) If a legislator employs only one legislative assistant, the assistant
may participate in the state's group life, health, and hospitalization insurance
program and the state employees' retirement system if the assistant receives at least
sixty percent of the total compensation available to employ the legislative assistant.
(b) When a legislator employs more than one legislative assistant, the
primary legislative assistant may participate in the state's group life, health, and
hospitalization insurance program and the state employees' retirement system.
"Primary legislative assistant" means the legislative assistant who receives the
highest salary and whose salary is at least sixty percent of the total salary that such
assistant can be paid.
(c) Any legislative assistant who does not meet the criteria set forth in this
Subsection shall not be eligible to participate in these benefits.
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-643 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 335
(2) All legislative assistants shall be eligible for workers' compensation
coverage as state employees immediately upon employment.